Hawaii statutes.
[§651C-7] Remedies of creditors. (a)
In any action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this chapter, a
creditor, subject to the limitations provided in section 651C-8, may obtain:

(1) Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the
extent necessary to satisfy the creditor's claim;

(2) An attachment or other provisional remedy against
the asset transferred or other property of the transferee in accordance with
the procedure prescribed by chapter 651;

(3) Subject to applicable principles of equity and in
accordance with applicable civil rules of procedure:

(A) An injunction against further disposition
by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other
property;

(B) Appointment of a receiver to take charge
of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

(C) Any other relief the circumstances may
require.

(b) If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a
claim against the debtor, the creditor may, if the court so orders, levy
execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds. [L 1985, c 216, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Action in which plaintiff made fraudulent transfer claims
under the Hawaii uniform fraudulent transfer act, seeking to avoid the transfer
of real property to the extent necessary to satisfy plaintiff's claims and/or
to grant plaintiff other relief under subsection (a), was an appropriate
subject of a lis pendens under the Hawaii doctrine of lis pendens, codified in
§634-51. 457 F. Supp. 2d 1121 (2006).

Petitioners were entitled to a variety of means (§§651C-8 and
651C-10 and this section) to secure a full recovery of their losses from
respondent and/or the asset fraudulently transferred to respondent, but only
once, not twice; moreover, nothing in this chapter requires petitioners to
elect one remedy over another. This chapter does not, however, allow
petitioners recovery of both the asset transferred (regardless of its value)
and, in addition, a judgment in the full amount of their damages. 130 H. 58
(App.), 305 P.3d 474 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next